Maine, session 132, LD1244.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA c. 279 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 279
WARMING SHELTERS
§1700-F. Warming shelters required
A county or municipality in this State shall make available a warming shelter, at an
appropriate venue accessible to the public, whenever the temperature is expected to be
below 40 degrees Fahrenheit. The warming shelter must be open outside the normal
operating hours of the venue providing the warming shelter.